Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.13, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Staff development. (a) A license holder must ensure that each staff member has the training described in this subdivision. (b) Each staff member must be trained every two years in: (1) client confidentiality rules and regulations and client ethical boundaries; and (2) emergency procedures and client rights as specified in sections 144.651, 148F.165, and 253B.03. (c) Annually each staff member with direct contact must be trained on mandatory reporting as specified in sections 245A.65, 626.557, and 626.5572, and chapter 260E, including specific training covering the license holder's policies for obtaining a release of client information. (d) Upon employment and annually thereafter, each staff member with direct contact must receive training on HIV minimum standards according to section 245A.19. (e) The license holder must ensure that each mandatory reporter, as described in section 260E.06, subdivision 1, is trained on the maltreatment of minors reporting requirements and definitions in chapter 260E before the mandatory reporter has direct contact, as defined in section 245C.02, subdivision 11, with a person served by the program. (f) A treatment director, supervisor, nurse, or counselor must have a minimum of 12 hours of training in co-occurring disorders that includes competencies related to philosophy, trauma-informed care, screening, assessment, diagnosis and person-centered treatment planning, documentation, programming, medication, collaboration, mental health consultation, and discharge planning. A new staff member who has not obtained the training must complete the training within six months of employment. A staff member may request, and the license holder may grant, credit for relevant training obtained before employment, which must be documented in the staff member's personnel file. new text begin (g) Each staff member must complete initial training and be trained every two years thereafter on accessibility, communications access, and sensory safety for individuals with disabilities in substance use disorder treatment programs. For purposes of this subdivision, "individuals with disabilities" includes individuals with traumatic brain injuries, developmental disabilities, cognitive disabilities, and physical disabilities. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245I.05, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Initial training. (a) A staff person must receive training about: (1) vulnerable adult maltreatment under section 245A.65, subdivision 3; and (2) the maltreatment of minor reporting requirements and definitions in chapter 260E within 72 hours of first providing direct contact services to a client. (b) Before providing direct contact services to a client, a staff person must receive training about: (1) client rights and protections under section 245I.12; (2) the Minnesota Health Records Act, including client confidentiality, family engagement under section 144.294, and client privacy; (3) emergency procedures that the staff person must follow when responding to a fire, inclement weather, a report of a missing person, and a behavioral or medical emergency; (4) specific activities and job functions for which the staff person is responsible, including the license holder's program policies and procedures applicable to the staff person's position; (5) professional boundaries that the staff person must maintain; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (6) accessibility, communications access, and sensory safety for individuals with disabilities receiving mental health treatment services. For purposes of this subdivision, "individuals with disabilities" includes individuals with traumatic brain injuries, developmental disabilities, cognitive disabilities, and physical disabilities; and new text end deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end specific needs of each client to whom the staff person will be providing direct contact services, including each client's developmental status, cognitive functioning, and physical and mental abilities. (c) Before providing direct contact services to a client, a mental health rehabilitation worker, mental health behavioral aide, or behavioral health practitioner required to receive the training according to section 245I.04, subdivision 4, must receive 30 hours of training about: (1) mental illnesses; (2) client recovery and resiliency; (3) mental health de-escalation techniques; (4) co-occurring mental illness and substance use disorders; and (5) psychotropic medications and medication side effects, including tardive dyskinesia. (d) Within 90 days of first providing direct contact services to an adult client, new text begin a new text end behavioral health practitioner, mental health certified peer specialist, or mental health rehabilitation worker must receive training about: (1) trauma-informed care and secondary trauma; (2) person-centered individual treatment plans, including seeking partnerships with family and other natural supports; (3) co-occurring substance use disorders; and (4) culturally responsive treatment practices. (e) Within 90 days of first providing direct contact services to a child client, behavioral health practitioner, mental health certified family peer specialist, mental health certified peer specialist, or mental health behavioral aide must receive training about the topics in clauses (1) to (5). This training must address the developmental characteristics of each child served by the license holder and address the needs of each child in the context of the child's family, support system, and culture. Training topics must include: (1) trauma-informed care and secondary trauma, including adverse childhood experiences (ACEs); (2) family-centered treatment plan development, including seeking partnership with a child client's family and other natural supports; (3) mental illness and co-occurring substance use disorders in family systems; (4) culturally responsive treatment practices; and (5) child development, including cognitive functioning, and physical and mental abilities. (f) For a mental health behavioral aide, the training under paragraph (e) must include parent team training using a curriculum approved by the commissioner. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245I.05, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Ongoing training. (a) A license holder must ensure that staff persons who provide direct contact services to clients receive annual training about the topics in subdivision 3, paragraphs (a) and (b), clauses (1) to (3). (b) A license holder must ensure that each staff person who is qualified under section 245I.04 who is not a mental health professional receives 30 hours of training every two years. The training topics must be based on the program's needs and the staff person's areas of competencynew text begin and must include training on accessibility, communications access, and sensory safety for individuals with disabilities receiving mental health treatment servicesnew text end .